Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 7. Fees, Charges, and Penalties.

Sec. 10.15.530.
Biennial license fee.

Each cooperative not organized and operated for nonprofit religious, charitable, cemetery, or educational purposes shall pay to the department a biennial license fee.
The fee shall be paid before July 2 of the reporting year.

History.

(§ 61(1) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 49 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Secs. 10.15.535,
10.15.540.
Determination of license fee for cooperative authorized to issue capital stock; valuation of no-par stock. [Repealed, § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 10.15.545.
Amount of license fee.

The license fee of each cooperative shall be established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 61(3) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 26 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 51 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 11 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.15.550.
Penalty.

A cooperative that fails to pay the annual license fee before August 15 shall pay a penalty of $10 for each year or part of a year of delinquency.

History.

(§ 61(4) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 27 ch 170 SLA 1976)

Sec. 10.15.555.
Miscellaneous fees and charges.

The department shall establish by regulation and charge and collect from a cooperative fees for filing

articles of incorporation or articles of consolidation for a new cooperative;

articles of amendment, restated articles, or articles of merger;

statement of intent to dissolve;

statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings;

articles of dissolution;

all other statements.

The department may by regulation charge each cooperative corporation subject to this chapter a fixed fee in place of charging cooperative corporations the various fees specified in this chapter and for routine administrative services rendered to the cooperative corporation by the department. Fixed fees established under this subsection must be based on the department’s actual cost of administering the activity or service for which the fee is charged.

History.

(§ 62(1) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 28 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 52 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 18 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 12 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.15.560.
Payment required for filing.

The department may not file a document until all fees and charges required to be paid have been paid or while the cooperative is in default in the payment of fees, charges or penalties provided in this chapter to be paid by or assessed against it.

History.

(§ 62(2) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.563.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]